Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-151
Substitution of collateral; certificate; recording; contents.

(1) A person who has deposited money or a surety bond with the clerk of the district court in substitution of collateral as provided in section 52-142 may record a certificate of the clerk of the district court showing the deposit.

(2) The certificate, which shall be signed by the clerk of the district court, shall state the amount deposited, if money, or, if a surety bond, the amount of the bond and the name and address of the surety company.

(3) The certificate also shall state, on the basis of information supplied by the person making the deposit:

(a) The real estate being improved with a description thereof sufficient for identification;

(b) The name and address of the person in whose behalf the deposit was made;

(c) If a surety bond is deposited, the name and address of a person on whom service of process may be made; and

(d) The name of the claimants for whom the deposit is made, the amount of their claims, and the record location of their liens.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 27.